Illinois, session 104th, HB4316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 14-20 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/14-20)7    Sec. 14-20. Certificate of error; counties of less than 83,000,000. 9    (a) In any county with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, 10if, at any time before judgment or order of sale is entered in 11any proceeding to collect or to enjoin the collection of taxes 12based upon any assessment of any property, the chief county 13assessment officer discovers an error or mistake in the 14assessment (other than errors of judgment as to the valuation 15of the property), he or she shall issue to the person 16erroneously assessed a certificate setting forth the nature of 17the error and the cause or causes of the error. In any county 18with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an owner fails to 19file an application for any homestead exemption provided under 20Article 15 during the previous assessment year and qualifies 21for the exemption, the Chief County Assessment Officer 22pursuant to this Section, or the Board of Review pursuant to 23Section 16-75, shall issue a certificate of error setting   HB4316- 2 -LRB104 16656 HLH 30060 b1forth the correct taxable valuation of the property. The 2certificate, when properly endorsed by the majority of the 3board of review, showing their concurrence, and not otherwise, 4may be used in evidence in any court of competent 5jurisdiction, and when so introduced in evidence, shall become 6a part of the court record and shall not be removed from the 7files except on an order of the court.8    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 9certificate of error may be issued at any time if the error 10relates to the homestead exemption for veterans with 11disabilities and veterans of World War II under Section 1215-169. A certificate of error issued under this paragraph is 13not subject to the limitation in subsection (a) that the 14certificate must be issued before judgment or order of sale, 15and the certificate may be issued retroactively for any 16applicable assessment year for which the taxpayer qualified 17for the exemption. 18(Source: P.A. 96-522, eff. 8-14-09.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.